District of Columbia statutes.
38-731.03

Establishment of the District of Columbia Financial Literacy Council.

There is established the District of Columbia Financial Literacy Council to assist and advise the Mayor and the Council in promoting the financial literacy of the residents of the District.

Aug. 15, 2008, D.C. Law 17-209, § 4, 55 DCR 6979